Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201650-413
Legislative Council; minutes of meetings;
reports.

The Legislative Council shall
keep complete minutes of its meetings and shall submit
electronically periodical reports to the members of the Legislature.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 9, p. 424;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-509;

R.S.1943, § 50-413;

Laws 1949, c. 168, § 7, p. 446;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 76.